csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_VV.yaml
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: maajiibatookan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: maajiibatookeg
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: maajiibatookang
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: maajiibatoon
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [maajiibatoog,maajiibatook]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: maajiibatoodaa
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: madaabiikan
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: madaabiikeg
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: madaabiikang
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: madaabiin
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [madaabiig,madaabiik]
     madaabii+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: madaabiidaa
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: nibaakan
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: nibaakeg
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: nibaakang
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: nibaaken
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: nibaakegon
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: nibaasiidaa
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: nibaan
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [nibaag,nibaak]
     nibaa+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: nibaadaa
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+NA: webinigekan
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+NA: webinigekeg
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+NA: webinigekang
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+NA: MISSING
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+NA: webinigen
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+NA: [webinigeg,webinigek]
     webinige+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+NA: webinigedaa
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoo
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoom
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoo
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoowa',maajiibatoowan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoowag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoowan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoo
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoomin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoomin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoom
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [nimaajiibatoosii,nimaajiibatoosiin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [gimaajiibatoosii,gimaajiibatoosiin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoosiiwa',maajiibatoosiiwan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiwag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiiwan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [maajiibatoosii,maajiibatoosiin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoosiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiimin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: maajiibatoosiim
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoonaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoomwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoonaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoobanii',maajiibatoobaniin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoobaniig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoobaniin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatooban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoominaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoominaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoomwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoosiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoosiinaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoosiibanii',maajiibatoosiibaniin]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiibaniig
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiibaniin
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiiban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoosiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiiminaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: maajiibatoosiimwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoonaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoomwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoonaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoodogena',maajiibatoodogenan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoodogenag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoodogenan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoodog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoominaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoominaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoomwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimaajiibatoosiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimaajiibatoosiinaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [maajiibatoosiidogena',maajiibatoosiidogenan]
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiidogenag
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiidogenan
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiidog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nimaajiibatoosiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: gimaajiibatoosiiminaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: maajiibatoosiimwaadog
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoogwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoonigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoogoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigwaaban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: maajiibatoosiinigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: maajiibatoosiigoban
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     maajiibatoo+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: nimadaabii
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: gimadaabii
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiiwa',madaabiiwan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiiwag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiiwan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: madaabii
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: nimadaabiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: gimadaabiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: madaabiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [nimadaabiisii,nimadaabiisiin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiisiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [gimadaabiisii,gimadaabiisiin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiisiiwa',madaabiisiiwan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiiwag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiiwan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: [madaabiisii,madaabiisiin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: nimadaabiisiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: gimadaabiisiimin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+NA: madaabiisiim
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiibanii',madaabiibaniin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiibaniig
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiibaniin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiiban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: nimadaabiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: gimadaabiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+NA: madaabiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiisiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiisiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiisiinaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiisiibanii',madaabiisiibaniin]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiibaniig
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiibaniin
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiiban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: nimadaabiisiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: gimadaabiisiiminaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+NA: madaabiisiimwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiidogena',madaabiidogenan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiidogenag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiidogenan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiidog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: nimadaabiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: gimadaabiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+NA: madaabiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: nimadaabiisiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: gimadaabiisiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: gimadaabiisiinaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: [madaabiisiidogena',madaabiisiidogenan]
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiidogenag
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiidogenan
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiidog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: nimadaabiisiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: gimadaabiisiiminaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+NA: madaabiisiimwaadog
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: madaabiisiigwaaban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: madaabiisiinigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: madaabiisiigoban
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: MISSING
     madaabii+VAI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: MISSING
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: ninibaa
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: ginibaam
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: ginibaa
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: [nibaawa',nibaawan]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: nibaawag
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: nibaawan
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: nibaa
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: ninibaamin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: ginibaamin
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+NA: nibaam
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: [ninibaasii,ninibaasiin]
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: ginibaasiim
     nibaa+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: [ginibaasii,ginibaasiin]
